test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_vyelgiskyettid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - vyelgiškyettiđ: # MLO, checked

    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Inf: vyelgiškyettiđ
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vyelgiškuáđám
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vyelgiškuáđáh
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vyelgiškuát
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: vyelgiškyetteen
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: vyelgiškyetvettee
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: vyelgiškyettiv
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vyelgiškyettip
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vyelgiškyetvetteđ
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [vyelgiškyetih, vyelgiškyeteh]

    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vyelgiškuottim
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vyelgiškuottih
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vyelgiškuođij
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: vyelgiškuođijm
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: vyelgiškuođijd
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: vyelgiškuođijn
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vyelgiškuođijm
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vyelgiškuođijd
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vyelgiškuottii

    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: vyelgiškuáđáččim
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: vyelgiškuáđáččih
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: vyelgiškuáđáččij
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: vyelgiškuáđáččáim
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: vyelgiškuáđáččáid
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: vyelgiškuáđáččáin
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: vyelgiškuáđáččijm
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: vyelgiškuáđáččijd
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: vyelgiškuáđáččii

    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: vyelgiškyeđeem
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: vyelgiškyeđeeh
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: vyelgiškuođiš
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: vyelgiškuođižeen
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: vyelgiškuođišvettee
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: vyelgiškuođižává
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: vyelgiškuođižep
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: vyelgiškuođišvetteđ
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: vyelgiškuođižeh

    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Imprt+Sg2: vyelgiškyeđe
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Imprt+Sg3: vyelgiškuáđus
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Imprt+Du1: vyelgiškuáttoon
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Imprt+Du2: vyelgiškyettee
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Imprt+Du3: vyelgiškuáttus
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Imprt+Pl1: vyelgiškuáttup
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Imprt+Pl2: vyelgiškyettiđ
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Imprt+Pl3: vyelgiškuáttus

    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vyelgiškyeđe
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: vyelgiškuáttám
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: vyelgiškuáđáá
#vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+PrsPrc: vyelgiškyettee
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+PrfPrc: vyelgiškuáttám
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Actio: vyelgiškyettim
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Actio+Ess: vyelgiškyetmin
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Actio+Loc: vyelgiškyetmist
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Actio+Ill: vyelgiškyetmân
#vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+VAbess: vyelgiškyethánnáá


  Verb - monâškyettiđ: # MLO, checked

    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Inf: monâškyettiđ
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: monâškuáđám
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: monâškuáđáh
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: monâškuát
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: monâškyetteen
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: monâškyetvettee
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: monâškyettiv
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: monâškyettip
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: monâškyetvetteđ
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [monâškyetih, monâškyeteh]

    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: monâškuottim
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: monâškuottih
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: monâškuođij
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: monâškuođijm
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: monâškuođijd
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: monâškuođijn
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: monâškuođijm
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: monâškuođijd
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: monâškuottii

    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: monâškuáđáččim
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: monâškuáđáččih
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: monâškuáđáččij
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: monâškuáđáččáim
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: monâškuáđáččáid
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: monâškuáđáččáin
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: monâškuáđáččijm
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: monâškuáđáččijd
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: monâškuáđáččii

    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: monâškyeđeem
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: monâškyeđeeh
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: monâškuođiš
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: monâškuođižeen
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: monâškuođišvettee
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: monâškuođižává
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: monâškuođižep
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: monâškuođišvetteđ
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: monâškuođižeh

    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Imprt+Sg2: monâškyeđe
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Imprt+Sg3: monâškuáđus
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Imprt+Du1: monâškuáttoon
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Imprt+Du2: monâškyettee
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Imprt+Du3: monâškuáttus
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Imprt+Pl1: monâškuáttup
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Imprt+Pl2: monâškyettiđ
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Imprt+Pl3: monâškuáttus

    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: monâškyeđe
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: monâškuáttám
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: monâškuáđáá
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+PrsPrc: monâškyettee
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+PrfPrc: monâškuáttám
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Actio: monâškyettim
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Actio+Ess: monâškyetmin
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Actio+Loc: monâškyetmist
    moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Actio+Ill: monâškyetmân
#moonnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+VAbess: monâškyethánnáá
